dictionaries/sk_SK/sk_SK.dic
abstrúzny/YN po:adjective
adrenalínový/Y po:adjective
agrárnický/YN po:adjective
aktérky/Y po:adjective
amatérsky/YN po:adjective
anonymný/YN po:adjective
apov/Y po:adjective
asistovaný/YN po:adjective
autologický/YN po:adjective
bájoslovný/YN po:adjective
básnikov/Y po:adjective
bekov/Y po:adjective
besný/YN po:adjective
bezrodový/YN po:adjective
Billov/Y po:adjective
blikavý/YN po:adjective
Bonifácov/Y po:adjective
briestenský/YN po:adjective
bulharský/YN po:adjective
celopodnikový/YN po:adjective
cifrovaný/YN po:adjective
cukrovinkový/YN po:adjective
černavý/YN po:adjective
čistiaci/YN po:adjective
dardanelský/YN po:adjective
dechtovitý/YN po:adjective
denominatívny/Y po:adjective
deväťdňový/YN po:adjective
difuzérov/Y po:adjective
dixielandový/Y po:adjective
dohodovaný/YN po:adjective
domorodý/YN po:adjective
dosvedčený/YN po:adjective
drapákový/YN po:adjective
družobníkov/Y po:adjective
dvadsaťsedemročný/Y po:adjective
dvojslabičný/YN po:adjective
eklekticistický/Y po:adjective
endemický/Y po:adjective
etylalkoholový/Y po:adjective
expresionistický/YN po:adjective
farníkov/Y po:adjective
filiálny/YN po:adjective
forenzný/YN po:adjective
fritovaný/YN po:adjective
gangsterský/YN po:adjective
gestorský/YN po:adjective
gravidný/Y po:adjective
Hadušovský/YN po:adjective
hebký/YN po:adjective
hladujúci/YN po:adjective
hnedožltý/YN po:adjective
homoľový/YN po:adjective
hráčov/Y po:adjective
hrubostenný/YN po:adjective
hybridizačný/YN po:adjective
chilský/YN po:adjective
chromatický/YN po:adjective
ihlovitý/YN po:adjective
indigový/YN po:adjective
inšpirovaný/YN po:adjective
intuitívny/YN po:adjective
jadernicový/YN po:adjective
jazdný/YN po:adjective
jednosmerný/YN po:adjective
juchtový/YN po:adjective
kamaldulov/Y po:adjective
karamelový/YN po:adjective
katapultový/YN po:adjective
kladový/YN po:adjective
kmeňotvorný/YN po:adjective
kolchozníkov/Y po:adjective
kompresný/YN po:adjective
konopný/YN po:adjective
koordinatívny/YN po:adjective
kosodĺžnikový/YN po:adjective
krajčírsky/YN po:adjective
kretónový/YN po:adjective
krúpnatý/YN po:adjective
Kunčický/YN po:adjective
kvitovaný/YN po:adjective
ľaliový/YN po:adjective
legionárov/Y po:adjective
lexikografov/Y po:adjective
líniový/YN po:adjective
Lopašovský/YN po:adjective
lurexový/YN po:adjective
Majnerová/Y po:adjective
mamin/Y po:adjective
martinský/YN po:adjective
maznákov/Y po:adjective
meissenský/YN po:adjective
miazgový/YN po:adjective
mimozemský/YN po:adjective
mnohobodový/YN po:adjective
mochovský/YN po:adjective
Morsov/Y po:adjective
multiservisný/YN po:adjective
načervenalý/Y po:adjective
nadzvukový/YN po:adjective
nákupný/YN po:adjective
naplnený/YN po:adjective
následníkov/Y po:adjective
navigačný/YN po:adjective
negatívny/Y po:adjective
netrebný/Y po:adjective
nitkový/Y po:adjective
novodedinský/YN po:adjective
obdratý/Y po:adjective
obmieňaný/YN po:adjective
obviazaný/YN po:adjective
odhadový/YN po:adjective
odpichový/YN po:adjective
odvádzaný/YN po:adjective
oidipovský/YN po:adjective
omietkársky/YN po:adjective
opovážlivcov/Y po:adjective
osadený/YN po:adjective
ostnatý/YN po:adjective
otrundžený/YN po:adjective
Pakistancov/Y po:adjective
páperový/YN po:adjective
pasienkársky/YN po:adjective
päťjadrový/YN po:adjective
penzijný/YN po:adjective
petrovský/YN po:adjective
pivovarský/YN po:adjective
plešivastý/YN po:adjective
pobočný/YN po:adjective
podlučký/YN po:adjective
podšívkový/YN po:adjective
pojatý/YN po:adjective
polmesiačikovitý/YN po:adjective
polygénny/YN po:adjective
popárený/YN po:adjective
portlandský/YN po:adjective
postsocialistický/YN po:adjective
používajúci/Y po:adjective
poznačený/YN po:adjective
prapôvodný/YN po:adjective
predavačský/YN po:adjective
predrevolučný/YN po:adjective
prekalkulovaný/YN po:adjective
premýšlajúci/YN	po:adjective
presbyteriánov/Y po:adjective
preúbohý/YN po:adjective
pribrzdený/YN po:adjective
prihrubý/YN po:adjective
pripodobnený/YN po:adjective
prítokový/YN po:adjective
prometejský/YN po:adjective
protiprávny/YN po:adjective
pstruhový/YN po:adjective
racionálny/YN po:adjective
rarášokov/Y po:adjective
reflektovaný/YN po:adjective
reparačný/Y po:adjective
rezonančný/YN po:adjective
roľký/YN po:adjective
rozdávaný/YN po:adjective
rozlúštiteľný/YN po:adjective
rozprávkárov/Y po:adjective
rozvíjajúci/YN po:adjective
rusofilský/YN po:adjective
sakrolumbálny/YN po:adjective
saňový/YN po:adjective
sedemstokorunový/YN po:adjective
senzorický/YN po:adjective
siderálny/YN po:adjective
skamenelý/YN po:adjective
skosený/YN po:adjective
slabunký/YN po:adjective
Slovákov/Y po:adjective
snímaný/YN po:adjective
sotvaktorý/YN po:adjective
splesnetý/YN po:adjective
spomenutý/YN po:adjective
spupne/YN po:adjective
staroslovenský/YN po:adjective
stlačovaný/YN po:adjective
strážny/YN po:adjective
stŕpnutý/YN po:adjective
súčinový/YN po:adjective
surovinový/YN po:adjective
svetobežcov/Y po:adjective
synonymický/YN po:adjective
šedivomodrý/YN po:adjective
šindľový/YN po:adjective
škuláňov/Y po:adjective
šplhúňov/Y po:adjective
štrbinový/YN po:adjective
štvorveršový/YN po:adjective
tabákový/YN po:adjective
Tatárov/Y po:adjective
temporálny/YN po:adjective
texaskový/YN po:adjective
tlstulinký/YN po:adjective
toxigénny/YN po:adjective
Trenčanov/Y po:adjective
trojciferný/YN po:adjective
truhlový/YN po:adjective
tvorcov/Y po:adjective
údenárov/Y po:adjective
úkladne/YN po:adjective
úmyselný/YN po:adjective
upresnený/YN po:adjective
usporiadateľský/YN po:adjective
útrobový/YN po:adjective
vábny/YN po:adjective
vavrínový/YN po:adjective
veľkomestský/YN po:adjective
vetrákový/YN po:adjective
vidlovitý/YN po:adjective
vkutý/YN po:adjective
vodený/YN po:adjective
vpisovaný/YN po:adjective
vstreknutý/YN po:adjective
vycifrovaný/YN po:adjective
vyhorený/YN po:adjective
vykrádaný/YN po:adjective
vynulovaný/YN po:adjective
výražkový/YN po:adjective
vysokopríjmový/YN po:adjective
vyšponovaný/YN po:adjective
vyvrheľov/Y po:adjective
vzrušený/YN po:adjective
zacundraný/YN po:adjective
zahojený/YN po:adjective
zakorenený/YN po:adjective
zanedbaný/YN po:adjective
zaprášený/YN po:adjective
zastrešený/YN po:adjective
zavesený/Y po:adjective
zbombardovaný/YN po:adjective
zelenáčov/Y po:adjective
ziskubažný/YN po:adjective
zmagnetizovaný/YN po:adjective
znelkový/YN po:adjective
zostávajúci/YN po:adjective
zriaďujúci/YN po:adjective
zväzkový/YN po:adjective
zvýraznený/YN po:adjective
žiarlivcov/Y po:adjective
žrcov/Y po:adjective
